Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3552
Hospital district; board of directors; budget statement; tax; levy; limitation; additional annual tax; election; collection.

(1) The board of directors may, after the adoption of the budget statement, levy and collect an annual tax which the district requires under the adopted budget statement to be received from taxation for the ensuing fiscal year not to exceed three and five-tenths cents on each one hundred dollars of the taxable value of the taxable property within such district. On and after July 1, 1998, the tax levy provided in this subsection is subject to section 77-3443.

(2) In addition to the levy authorized in subsection (1) of this section, the board of directors of a hospital district may authorize an additional annual tax not to exceed three and five-tenths cents on each one hundred dollars of the taxable value of the taxable property within such district. On and after July 1, 1998, the tax levy provided in this subsection is subject to section 77-3443. Such tax shall not be authorized until the question of such additional tax has been submitted to the qualified electors of the district at a primary or general election or a special election called for that purpose and a majority of those voting approve the additional tax. Notice of the time and place of the special election shall be given by publication at least once each week in a legal newspaper of general circulation in the district for three successive weeks immediately preceding such election.

(3) Until July 1, 1998, the taxes authorized by subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall not be included within the levy limitations for general county purposes prescribed in section 23-119 or Article VIII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska. On and after July 1, 1998, the taxes authorized by subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall not be included within the levy limitations for general county purposes prescribed in section 77-3442 or Article VIII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska. On and after July 1, 1998, for purposes of section 77-3443, the county board of each of the counties having land embraced within the district shall approve the tax levy.

(4) The taxes authorized by subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall not be used to support or supplement the operations of health care services or facilities located outside the geographic boundaries of the district.

(5) The board shall annually, on or before September 20, certify the taxes authorized by this section to the county clerk of each of the counties having land embraced within such district. The county clerk shall extend such levies on the tax list, and the county treasurer shall collect the tax in the same manner as county taxes and shall remit the taxes collected to the county treasurer of the county in which the petition for the formation of the district was filed. The county treasurer shall credit the local hospital district with the amount thereof and make disbursements therefrom on warrants of the district signed by the chairperson and secretary-treasurer of the board of directors.

Laws 1959, c. 83, § 27, p. 383;

Laws 1969, c. 145, § 29, p. 690;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 111;

Laws 1986, LB 753, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.46;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 23;

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 28;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 23;

Laws 1993, LB 734, § 34;

Laws 1995, LB 452, § 7;

Laws 1996, LB 1114, § 50;

Laws 1997, LB 28, § 2.